Tennessee, session 114, SB0028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-308(e)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(2) "Communicate" means contacting a person in the physical presence of the
person, in writing or print, or by telephone, wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic,
photooptical, or electronic means, and includes verbal and nonverbal communication,
text messages, flyers, facsimile transmissions, electronic mail, instant messages, and
messages, images, video, sound recordings, voice recordings, or intelligence of any
nature sent through or posted on social networks, social media, or websites;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0028
000755
- 1 -